Washington statutes.
RCW 15.15.005

Legislative findings.

The legislature finds that the production of high quality certified seed potatoes within the state requires conditions that are as free as possible from insect pests and plant diseases and that ensuring these conditions exist is in the public interest. The legislature further finds that the production of other potatoes intermixed with or in close proximity to a concentrated seed potato production area poses an increased risk of introduction of plant diseases and insect pests.

[ 1997 c 176 s 1.]